District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.42

Open meetings.

(a)

All meetings (including hearings) of any department, agency, board, or commission of the District government, including meetings of the Council of the District of Columbia, at which official action of any kind is taken shall be open to the public. No resolution, rule, act, regulation, or other official action shall be effective unless taken, made, or enacted at such meeting.

(b)

A written transcript or a transcription shall be kept for all such meetings and shall be made available to the public during normal business hours of the District government. Copies of such written transcripts or copies of such transcriptions shall be available, upon request, to the public at reasonable cost.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 831, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 742

Cross References

Advisory neighborhood commission security fund, requests for reimbursement from fund, consideration in public meetings, see § 1-309.14.
Advisory Neighborhood Commissions, open meeting requirement, see § 1-309.11.
Commission on Judicial Disabilities and Tenure, authority to make rules and regulations for commission’s operations, application of certain selected provisions of Administrative Procedure Act, see § 11-1525.
Convention center authority board of directors, open meeting requirement, see § 10-1202.05.
Convention center board of directors, open meeting requirement, see § 10-1211.
Fees for reproduction of transcripts and other records, authority to establish and collect, see § 1-301.49.
Financial responsibility and management assistance authority, open meeting requirement, see § 47-391.08.
Fire protection study commission, open meeting requirement, see § 3-1102.
Health and hospitals public benefit corporation board of directors, open meeting requirement, see § 44-1102.04.
Merit system, office of employee appeals, vote or decision on appeal to be made in public hearing, see § 1-606.10.
Sports and entertainment commission, open meeting requirement, see § 3-1404.
Water and sewer authority board of directors, open meeting requirement, see § 34-2202.04.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-129.04, § 1-204.34, § 1-301.49, § 1-309.11, § 2-579, § 3-1102, § 3-1353, § 4-752.03, § 4-1371.08, § 7-2271.04, § 8-671.11, § 8-1774.04, § 10-1202.05, § 16-1056, § 16-4205, § 16-4207, § 34-2202.04, § 44-951.05, and § 47-391.08.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1504.
1973 Ed., § 1-1503a.

Editor's Notes

Definitions applicable: The definitions contained in § 1-201.03 apply to this section.